Illinois, session 104th, HB723.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Murdered Children Funeral and Burial 5Assistance Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 80/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title; references to Act. 8    (a) Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Murdered 9Children Funeral and Burial Assistance Act.10    (b) References to Act. This Act may be referred to as the 11Mychal Moultry, Jr. Funeral and Burial Assistance Act.12(Source: P.A. 102-754, eff. 5-10-22.)